


Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft









 



















U.S. Lower 48 | Exploration and Production | What we do | BP U.S.













            Cookie notification

            We have placed cookies on your computer to help make this website better. You can change your cookie settings at any time. Otherwise, we'll assume you're OK to continue.










United States















                    BP Global







BP:
        GBp 
( )
        USD 
( )
        
        *
    


Share price feed currently unavailable



Enable javascript for shareprice












S
Search













BP U.S.


What we do


Exploration and Production


U.S. Lower 48



U.S. Lower 48







With a footprint that stretches from the Rocky Mountains to east Texas, BP’s Lower 48 onshore business is one of America’s largest natural gas producers. And it’s only getting bigger, recently having expanded operations in New Mexico.
 
The business produces natural gas — along with oil, condensate and gas liquids — from both conventional and unconventional rock formations. 

In 2015, it produced an average of 284,000 barrels of oil equivalent each day.
 
Headquartered in Houston, its operations span five states — Colorado, New Mexico, Oklahoma, Texas and Wyoming — and seven oil and gas basins, covering an area (5.7 million net acres) roughly the size of New Jersey.
 
While wholly owned by BP, the Lower 48 business began operating as a separate entity in 2015 in order to become more competitive in a rapidly changing exploration and production environment.The move has worked.
 
“Our new business model has allowed us to combine the resources and expertise of a major international oil and gas company, with the agility of an independent producer,” says Lower 48 CEO Dave Lawler. “We can allocate capital more efficiently, generate new project opportunities, and deliver innovative well designs and development programs much faster than in the past. This mix of capability and structure unlocks significant value from our large asset base, without compromising our commitment to safety and the environment.”
 
In 2015, the business bought all of Devon Energy’s assets in the San Juan Basin of New Mexico, a region in which BP has operated for more than 30 years. The expansion added nearly 15,000 net acres to its portfolio.
 
With decades of experience in the San Juan Basin, BP has a deep understanding of its reservoirs, and the Lower 48 business has combined that knowledge with innovative technology to help boost production efficiency.
 
In 2015, for example, the company made history by completing its first-ever “multilateral” wells in the basin.
 
Multilateral wells feature multiple horizontal wells connected to a single drilling hole, or “wellbore,” allowing producers to access more of the oil and gas in a given reservoir while reducing the number of drilling sites.
 
The Lower 48 business expects that a majority of its new wells in the San Juan Basin will be multilaterals, and it is pursuing similar welldesign improvements across all its operations.



States













Colorado













Oklahoma













Wyoming















New Mexico













Texas















 



















Commitment to safety | Who we are | BP U.S.














            Cookie notification

            We have placed cookies on your computer to help make this website better. You can change your cookie settings at any time. Otherwise, we'll assume you're OK to continue.










United States















                    BP Global







BP:
        GBp 
( )
        USD 
( )
        
        *
    


Share price feed currently unavailable



Enable javascript for shareprice












S
Search













BP U.S.


Who we are


Commitment to safety



Safety


Safety isn't something you do now and then, or when it's convenient. Safety is never being satisfied. And always working to be better.








Sorry, you need Javascript enabled to view this video.
Loading video
please wait...



Safety is a mindset.
A 24/7 philosophy summed up in 30 seconds.














Stopping Problems Before They Start
From technology to training to culture, we’re always looking for ways to stop potential problems in their tracks. 












Adapting Innovative Technologies 
We look at what’s revolutionizing other industries to see how it can make our operations even safer, too.














Sophisticated Support, Around the Clock
At BP, safety is a 24/7 job for everyone. See the innovative ways we have each other’s back. 












Perfecting Skills Before We Use Them
At BP, everyone depends on each another –  we train together as a team to be better prepared for any scenario.












Get to know safety at BP












Meet Ronica Hall
BP’s Whiting Refinery processes 19 million gallons of fuel a day. Ronica Hall is always looking for safer ways to get that job done.














Start to finish
From discovery to delivery, learn how BP puts its energy into safety every step of the way.














Meet Lori Knutson
See how Lori’s team stays safe both on and offshore.











A deeper dive




previous slide








How technology makes oil and gas safer
The energy we get from oil and gas is a critical part of everyday life, and safe operations rely on innovation in technology.

Explore more









Tracking change
Take a tour of BP's data systems which link production sites to a second pair of eyes.

Explore more





next slide





slide 1


slide 2










Resources








Learn more about BP's commitment to safety
 (pdf 418.7 KB)













 



















Sophisticated support, around the clock | Commitment to safety | Who we are | BP U.S.














            Cookie notification

            We have placed cookies on your computer to help make this website better. You can change your cookie settings at any time. Otherwise, we'll assume you're OK to continue.










United States















                    BP Global







BP:
        GBp 
( )
        USD 
( )
        
        *
    


Share price feed currently unavailable



Enable javascript for shareprice












S
Search













BP U.S.


Who we are


Commitment to safety


Sophisticated support, around the clock



Sophisticated support, around the clock











Monitoring Center













Immersive Team Training















Wireless Corrosion Sensors













Remote Weather Monitoring















Stop the Job







At BP, we’re always looking for new ways to have each other’s backs. From innovative approaches to training to 24/7 monitoring and more, the men and women of BP are supported by a broad network of people and technology.





Sorry, you need Javascript enabled to view this video.
Loading video
please wait...



Meet Bob Fryar and learn about the company's Houston Monitoring Center, where onshore experts provide offshore teams 24/7 support.















See what advanced weather warnings for wind operations looks like.















We train together as a team to be better prepared for different scenarios.












More about BP's Commitment to Safety












Stopping Problems Before They Start 
At BP, safety is never being satisfied. And always working to be better.














Adapting Innovative Technologies
We figure out how to take ideas revolutionizing other industries to make our own safer. Take a look.














Perfecting Skills Before We Use Them
Learn more about how we prepare for every  situation.














 



















Perfecting skills before we use them | Commitment to safety | Who we are | BP U.S.














            Cookie notification

            We have placed cookies on your computer to help make this website better. You can change your cookie settings at any time. Otherwise, we'll assume you're OK to continue.










United States















                    BP Global







BP:
        GBp 
( )
        USD 
( )
        
        *
    


Share price feed currently unavailable



Enable javascript for shareprice












S
Search













BP U.S.


Who we are


Commitment to safety


Perfecting skills before we use them



Perfecting skills before we use them











Drill Simulation Training















Immersive Team Training







At BP, everyone depends on each another – so we train together as a team to be better prepared for any scenario. 






Sorry, you need Javascript enabled to view this video.
Loading video
please wait...



See how team training works at BP.










More about BP's Commitment to Safety












Sophisticated Support, Around the Clock
See how we’re always finding new ways to have each others’ backs.














Stopping Problems Before They Start 
At BP, safety is never being satisfied. And always working to be better.














Adapting Innovative Technologies
We figure out how to take ideas revolutionizing other industries to make our own even safer. Take a look.


















Piedmont Natural Gas Co Inc in Lebanon, TN 37087 - ChamberofCommerce.com




   =     


        









Sign Up
Sign In
Contact Us


 














Search
 

near
 













Home
» Tennessee
» Lebanon
» Propane & Other Gases
» Piedmont Natural Gas Co Inc













Piedmont Natural Gas Co Inc


0 Reviews

0.0000 stars - based on 0 reviews
                            





422 S College St  Lebanon, Tennessee 37087


(615) 444-5798


 



 

Print |
                Save |
                Directions


About
Piedmont Natural Gas Co Inc is located at the address 422 S College St in Lebanon, Tennessee 37087.  They can be contacted via phone at (615) 444-5798 for pricing, hours and directions.  For maps and directions to Piedmont Natural Gas Co Inc view the map to the right.  For reviews of Piedmont Natural Gas Co Inc see below.









Business Features

PRODUCTS


Fuel Oil
, Oils
, Boilers
, Lubricants
, Fuel



 


Information

CONTACT INFORMATION
Phone: (615) 444-5798
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION:
Employee Size: 5 To 9
Exact Employee Count: 7
Location Type: Branch Location
CATEGORIES:


Propane & Other Gases
Petroleum & Petroleum Product Manufacturing & Wholesale
Business, Industry & Agriculture
Shopping
Manufacturing & Wholesale
Fuel & Gas



Reviews

Add


You must Sign in to post reviews.





by  on 






Click here to be the first to review this business...



0 Reviews
 























 






Site Map
FAQ
Privacy Policy
Terms of Use
About
Partners
Chamber Partner Program
Chamber Member Benefits




Top Cities:
Atlanta
Bronx
Brooklyn
Chicago
Cleveland
Dallas
Denver
Detroit
Houston
Las Vegas
Los Angeles
Miami
Minneapolis
New York
Philadelphia
Phoenix
Saint Louis
San Antonio
San Diego
San Jose


© 2017 CHAMBEROFCOMMERCE.COM











  PNY Stock Quote - Piedmont Natural Gas Co Inc - Bloomberg Markets                     



     Error: Could not add to watchlist. X   + Watchlist  Piedmont Natural Gas Co Inc   PNY:US      Acquired   PNY:US was acquired by DUK:US   USD             Volume   0                  


                Before it's here, it's on the Bloomberg Terminal.
            

                Learn More
            

         Volume   0    Current P/E Ratio (TTM)   -    Earnings per Share (USD) (TTM)   -    Market Cap (USD)   -    Shares Outstanding  (m)   83.091    Price/Sales (TTM)   -    Dividend Indicated Gross Yield   2.27%        Sector Utilities   % Price Change +0.22%     Industry Utilities   % Price Change +0.22%                    Related Videos  There are currently no related videos for this ticker. Please check back later.    Company News Press Releases   There are currently no news stories for this ticker. Please check back later.    There are currently no press releases for this ticker. Please check back later.      Profile   Piedmont Natural Gas Company, Inc. is an energy and services company that primarily transports, distributes, and sells natural gas. The Company serves residential, commercial, and industrial customers in North Carolina, South Carolina, and Tennessee. Piedmont also, through subsidiaries, markets natural gas to customers in Georgia.    Address  4720 Piedmont Row DriveCharlotte, NC 28210United States   Phone  1-704-364-3120   Website   www.piedmontng.com     Executives Board Members    Thomas E Skains "Tom"  Chairman/President/CEO    Karl W Newlin  Senior VP/CFO    Kevin M O'Hara  Senior VP/CAO    Franklin H Yoho  Senior VP/Chief Commercial Ofcr    Victor M Gaglio  Senior VP/Chief Utility Ops Ofcr     Show More         








Piedmont Natural Gas Co Inc - NYSE:PNY - Stock Quote & News - TheStreet






















 





















Action Alerts PLUS

Access AAPJim Cramer's Best Stocks for 2017Charitable Trust PortfolioMost Recent Trade Alert25 Investing Rules10 Trading Commandments

Real Money

Access RM25 Rules of InvestingJim Cramer's Best Stocks for 201710 CommandmentsStressed Out StocksCramer's Blog

Cramer
Mad Money
ETFs
Futures
Markets
Much More

BanksBiotechRetailTechPersonal FinanceRetirementFinancial Advisor CenterHow to SpendOptionsFixed IncomeVideo










Privacy Policy|Terms of Use© 1996- TheStreet Inc. All rights reserved
















                                DJIA
                            







                                NASDAQ
                            







                                S&P 500
                            






Market Data updated






Sign In




Your Membership(s)








Your Account





Account Preferences


Alerts


Newsletters







Subscribe





Logout



Subscribe

Access insights and guidance from our Wall Street pros. Find the product that's right for you.
Action Alerts PLUS
Action Alerts OPTIONS
Daily Swing Trade
Income Seeker
Quant Ratings
Real Money
Real Money Pro
Stocks Under $10
Top Stocks
Trifecta Stocks
Real Money Pro Portfolio
Chairman's Club
Compare All 
Chatter on the Street













































 






















Piedmont Natural Gas Co Inc (PNY)
Follow




                                    60.02
                                

0.02
0.03




                        NYSE : Utilities
                    

Oct 3, 2016 4:00 PM EDT












Prev Close
  60.04


Open
60.05


Day Low/High

                                    60.01 /
                                    60.05


52 Wk Low/High

                                    39.96 /
                                    60.35
                                


Volume
8.08M


Avg Volume 
416.00K











Exchange
NYSE


Shares Outstanding
83.09M


Market Cap
4.99B


EPS
1.70


P/E Ratio

                                        
                                            34.91
                                        
                                    


Div & Yield

                                        
                                            1.36
                                            (2.30%)

                                        
                                    























Trade with Jim Cramer 14 Days FREE 









Latest News









How Duke Energy Stock Can Power Your Portfolio











Piedmont Natural Gas Stock Sees Short Interest Decline 26.5%

















June 6 Premarket Briefing: 10 Things You Should Know
U.S. stock futures are up slightly as investors will look for clues about possible interest rate hikes when Federal Reserve Chair Janet Yellen speaks early Monday afternoon.

Jun 6, 2016 6:05 AM EDT













Piedmont Natural Gas (PNY) Hits New Lifetime High
Trade-Ideas LLC identified Piedmont Natural Gas (PNY) as a new lifetime high candidate

Jun 1, 2016 9:50 AM EDT













Constitution Pipeline Challenges Decision By New York State To Block Federally Approved Pipeline
Constitution Pipeline Company, LLC today announced that it has appealed the New York State Department of Environmental Conservation's (NYSDEC) refusal to grant the company's request for a Section 401 Water Quality...

May 16, 2016 4:15 PM EDT













Today's Strong And Under The Radar Stock: Piedmont Natural Gas (PNY)
Trade-Ideas LLC identified Piedmont Natural Gas (PNY) as a strong and under the radar candidate

May 9, 2016 10:07 AM EDT













Barbarian At The Gate: Piedmont Natural Gas (PNY)
Trade-Ideas LLC identified Piedmont Natural Gas (PNY) as a "barbarian at the gate" (strong stocks crossing above resistance with today's range greater than 200%) candidate

Apr 27, 2016 3:26 PM EDT













Constitution Pipeline Committed To Building Federally Approved Pipeline, Delivering Energy Savings And Environmental Benefits To Northeast U.S.
Constitution Pipeline Company, LLC announced today that it remains steadfastly committed to pursuing the federally-approved energy infrastructure project, despite the recent decision by the New York State Department of...

Apr 25, 2016 8:30 AM EDT













Strong And Under The Radar Today: Piedmont Natural Gas (PNY)
Trade-Ideas LLC identified Piedmont Natural Gas (PNY) as a strong and under the radar candidate

Apr 15, 2016 10:41 AM EDT













Insider Trading Alert - PNY, EGLT And MA Traded By Insiders
Stocks with insider trader activity include PNY, EGLT and MA

Apr 6, 2016 11:30 AM EDT













New Lifetime High Reached: Piedmont Natural Gas (PNY)
Trade-Ideas LLC identified Piedmont Natural Gas (PNY) as a new lifetime high candidate

Mar 18, 2016 9:46 AM EDT













Trade-Ideas: Piedmont Natural Gas (PNY) Is Today's New Lifetime High Stock
Trade-Ideas LLC identified Piedmont Natural Gas (PNY) as a new lifetime high candidate

Mar 9, 2016 9:46 AM EST













Piedmont Natural Gas (PNY) Highlighted As Strong And Under The Radar Stock Of The Day
Trade-Ideas LLC identified Piedmont Natural Gas (PNY) as a strong and under the radar candidate

Mar 7, 2016 10:39 AM EST













Trade-Ideas: Piedmont Natural Gas (PNY) Is Today's Strong And Under The Radar Stock
Trade-Ideas LLC identified Piedmont Natural Gas (PNY) as a strong and under the radar candidate

Feb 25, 2016 11:19 AM EST













New Lifetime High Reached By Piedmont Natural Gas (PNY)
Trade-Ideas LLC identified Piedmont Natural Gas (PNY) as a new lifetime high candidate

Feb 16, 2016 2:20 PM EST













Use Duke Energy as a Hedge Against Market Headwinds
Utilities like Duke Energy are safe-haven stocks in a time of turmoil.

Feb 16, 2016 8:53 AM EST













Piedmont Natural Gas (PNY) Reaches New Lifetime High Today
Trade-Ideas LLC identified Piedmont Natural Gas (PNY) as a new lifetime high candidate

Feb 9, 2016 10:18 AM EST













Constitution Pipeline Receives FERC Authorization To Proceed With Limited Tree Felling Activities In Pennsylvania
Constitution Pipeline Company, LLC received authorization from the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission (FERC) today to proceed with limited tree felling activities along its federally-certificated pipeline right-of-way in...

Jan 29, 2016 5:07 PM EST













New Lifetime High For Piedmont Natural Gas (PNY)
Trade-Ideas LLC identified Piedmont Natural Gas (PNY) as a new lifetime high candidate

Jan 29, 2016 9:57 AM EST













Piedmont Natural Gas (PNY) Is Today's Strong And Under The Radar Stock
Trade-Ideas LLC identified Piedmont Natural Gas (PNY) as a strong and under the radar candidate

Jan 26, 2016 9:53 AM EST













Piedmont Natural Gas (PNY) Showing Signs Of Being Strong And Under The Radar
Trade-Ideas LLC identified Piedmont Natural Gas (PNY) as a strong and under the radar candidate

Jan 19, 2016 12:59 PM EST













Piedmont Natural Gas (PNY) Is Today's Strong And Under The Radar Stock
Trade-Ideas LLC identified Piedmont Natural Gas (PNY) as a strong and under the radar candidate

Jan 6, 2016 10:26 AM EST













Utilities Stocks Year in Review: How to Power Your Portfolio In 2016
The sector suffered numerous problems in 2015, but things are poised to change in 2016.

Jan 1, 2016 11:15 AM EST













Short Interest Drops 37.3% For PNY
The most recent short interest data has been released by the NASDAQ for the 10/30/2015 settlement date, which shows a 1,337,362 share decrease in total short interest for Piedmont Natural Gas Co., Inc. , to 2,250,503, a decrease of 37.27% since 10/15/2015.

Nov 13, 2015 9:29 AM EST













PNY SHAREHOLDER ALERT: The Law Offices Of Vincent Wong Launches An Investigation Of The Board Of Directors Of Piedmont Natural Gas Company, Inc. Regarding The Sale Of The Company To Duke Energy Corp. -- PNY
The Law Offices of Vincent Wong are investigating potential claims against the Board of Directors of Piedmont Natural Gas Company, Inc.

Nov 2, 2015 12:11 PM EST













Electric Utilities Seek to Shock Shares Through Mergers
Industry deal volume and value are up sharply this year as utilities look to spur growth.

Oct 30, 2015 9:37 AM EDT













INVESTOR ALERT: Brower Piven Commences An Investigation Into The Proposed Sale Of Piedmont Natural Gas Co. Inc. And Encourages Investors To Contact The Firm For Additional Information
The securities litigation law firm of Brower Piven, A Professional Corporation, has commenced an investigation into possible breaches of fiduciary duty and other violations of state law by the Board of Directors of Piedmont...

Oct 29, 2015 5:27 PM EDT













EQUITY ALERT: Rosen Law Firm Announces Investigation Of Piedmont Natural Gas, Inc. Concerning Its Proposed Sale To Duke Energy Corporation
Rosen Law Firm, a global investor rights law firm, announces that it is investigating the Board of Directors of Piedmont Natural Gas, Inc.

Oct 28, 2015 4:20 PM EDT













PIEDMONT SHAREHOLDER NOTICE: Faruqi & Faruqi, LLP Announces The Investigation Of Piedmont Natural Gas Co. Inc. (PNY) Over The Proposed Sale Of The Company To Duke Energy Corporation
Faruqi & Faruqi, LLP, a leading national securities firm headquartered in New York City, is investigating the Board of Directors of Piedmont Natural Gas Co.

Oct 28, 2015 2:49 PM EDT













INVESTOR ALERT: Levi & Korsinsky, LLP Notifies Shareholders Of Piedmont Natural Gas Company, Inc. Of An Investigation Concerning The Fairness Of The Sale Of The Company To Duke Energy Corp.
The following statement is being issued by Levi & Korsinsky, LLP: To: All Persons or Entities who purchased Piedmont Natural Gas Company, Inc.

Oct 28, 2015 1:27 PM EDT



















Next






Load More








From Our Partners



Dividend Streaks In Danger: 2016 Review And 2017 Preview

SeekingAlpha



The Most Undervalued And Overvalued Dividend Champions - October 2016

SeekingAlpha



Upstream Loves Its Midstream Friends

SeekingAlpha



Gootwittle? Google Preps Twitter Bid

SeekingAlpha



Dave & Buster's +3.4%, joining S&P SmallCap 600

SeekingAlpha



Utilities Issue Equity At The Right Time And For The Right Reasons

SeekingAlpha



What's Next For Utility M&A?

SeekingAlpha



Atlantic Coast Pipeline chooses lead construction contractor

SeekingAlpha



Piedmont Natural Gas Company, Inc. (PNY) Ex-Dividend Date Scheduled for September 21, 2016

NASDAQ



Sempra Energy Unit Completes Sale of EnergySouth to Spire

Zacks



Piedmont Natural Gas beats by $0.02, misses on revenue

SeekingAlpha



Piedmont Natural Gas declares $0.34 dividend

SeekingAlpha



The Most Undervalued And Overvalued Dividend Champions - September 2016

SeekingAlpha



Duke Energy Is Compelling, But Sit On Your Hands For Now

SeekingAlpha



The Most Undervalued And Overvalued Dividend Champions - August 2016

SeekingAlpha


































 











Trending


Reversal of Fortunes: Cramer's 'Mad Money' Recap (Thursday 7/27/17)


Amazon's Earnings Miss, but Nothing Can Stop AWS


Intel Just Supercharged Its Business


Tesla's Model 3 Arrives on Friday -- Here's Everything You Need to Know


Here's How You Can Get a Decent Job at Amazon on August 2











Advertising Partners



 






 






 






 


























 

























 







































 


©1996-2017 TheStreet, Inc. All rights reserved.Action Alerts PLUS is a registered trademark of TheStreet, Inc.




Compare Brokers



 







 







 







 







 







 

















BBB Business Profile | Piedmont Natural Gas Co., Inc. | Accreditation


































Home
 > 
Accredited Business Directory
 > 
Natural Gas Companies
 > 
Piedmont Natural Gas Co., Inc.














BBB Accredited Business Profile



                            Is this your business? 
                                Claim it now.








Piedmont Natural Gas Co., Inc.



Submit a Review

































Piedmont Natural Gas Co., Inc.






            Business Information
        






(704) 364-3120

Piedmont Natural Gas Co., Inc.
66 years in business

        4720 Piedmont Row Dr Ste 100
        Charlotte, NC 28210-4294
    




                 WEBSITE
            





                    Additional Phone Numbers
                


                            (704) 525-3882
                        

                            (704) 525-5585
                        





See Less Contact Options
See More Contact Options





Find a Location






                BBB File Opened: 03/01/1980
            

                Business Started: 05/01/1951


                Business Started Locally: 01/01/1952
            






            Contact Information
        


                    Principal: Ms. Jennifer Richey, Admin Specialist III
                

                    Ms. Dorothy Covington, Liaison
                

                    Ms. Kathy Spake, Cust Assur
                

                    Customer Service: Customer Assurance
                





            Business Category
        


                Natural Gas Companies
            











                    Number of Employees: 
                
                600
            



See Less Business Information
See More Business Information


 







BBB Accreditation





                BBB Accredited Since 05/01/1953
            

                BBB has determined that Piedmont Natural Gas Co., Inc. meets Standards of BBB Accreditation, which include a commitment to make a good faith effort to resolve any consumer complaints. BBB Accredited Businesses pay a fee for accreditation review/monitoring and for support of BBB services to the public.
            

                BBB accreditation does not mean that the business's products or services have been evaluated or endorsed by BBB, or that BBB has made a determination as to the business's product quality or competency in performing services.
            








Standards of BBB Accreditation






Build Trust









            Establish and maintain a positive track record in the marketplace.
        

           An accredited business or organization agrees to:

                   1. Have been operational (actively selling products or services) in any BBB service area for at least the most recent 6 months, unless the principle(s) previously operated a similar business with an eligible record (one that qualifies for BBB accreditation).
                

                   1. Fulfill contracts signed and agreements reached.
                

                   3. Be free from government action that demonstrates a significant failure to support BBB ethical principles in marketplace transactions (this requires a determination by BBB as to the nature of any violation, whether it was caused or condoned by management, and actions taken to resolve underlying issues that led to the government action).
                
4. Be free of an unsatisfactory rating and maintain at least a B rating at the accrediting BBB and the BBB where it is headquartered, if different.

                   5. In its relationship with BBB: 
1. meet all applicable standards within this Code of Business Practices

                            2. cooperate with BBB's activities and efforts to promote voluntary self- regulation within the business' industry
                        
3. honor any settlements, agreements or decisions reached as an outcome of a BBB dispute resolution process

                            4. complete the required application and pay all monetary obligations to BBB in a timely manner
                        









Advertise Honestly









            Adhere to established standards of advertising and selling.
        

            An accredited business or organization agrees to: 

                    1. Follow federal, state/provincial and local advertising laws.
                

                    2. Abide by the BBB Code of Advertising. Supply, upon request, substantiation for advertising and selling claims. Correct advertising and selling practices, when recommended by BBB.
                
3. Adhere to applicable BBB industry codes of advertising.
4. Cooperate with BBB self-regulatory programs for the resolution of advertising disputes.
5. Use the BBB name and logos in accordance with BBB policy.

                    6. Avoid misleading customers by creating the false impression of sponsorship, endorsement, popularity, trustworthiness, product quality or business size through the misuse of logos, trustmarks, pictures, testimonials, or other means
                







Tell the Truth









            Honestly represent products and services, including clear and adequate disclosures of all material terms.
        

            An accredited business or organization agrees to: 

                    1. Make known all material facts in both written and verbal representations, remembering that misrepresentation may result not only from direct statements but by omitting or obscuring relevant facts.
                

                    2. Ensure that any written materials are readily available, clear, accurate and complete.
                







Be Transparent









            Openly identify the nature, location, and ownership of the business, and clearly disclose all policies, guarantees and procedures that bear on a customer's decision to buy.
        

            An accredited business or organization agrees to: 

                    1. Upon request, provide BBB with all information required to evaluate compliance with BBB standards. This may include, but is not limited to business name, address and contact information; names and background of principles; business and banking references; licensing and/or professional accreditation; and a complete description of the nature of the business.
                

                    2. Clearly disclose to customers:

                    
1. direct and effective means to contact the business
2. terms of any written contract
3. any guarantees or warranties accompanying a product

                            4. any restrictions or limitations imposed (e.g. limited supply,maximum number available per customer)
                        
5. the business' return/refund policy

                            6. any recurring commitment into which the customer may be entering, including information on how future billing will occur
                        
7. total cost of the transaction, including tax, shipping and handling, and other related charges



                    3. If selling products or providing services on Web sites or via other electronic means: 
1. provide any required product labeling information

                            2. disclose the nature and terms of shipping, including any known delays or shortages of stock
                        
3. provide an opportunity to review and confirm the transaction before the sale is completed

                            4. provide a receipt summarizing the transaction after the purchase
                        









Honor Promises









            Abide by all written agreements and verbal representations.
        

            An accredited business or organization agrees to: 
1. Fulfill contracts signed and agreements reached. 2. Honor representations by correcting mistakes as quickly as possible.







Be Responsive









            Address marketplace disputes quickly, professionally, and in good faith.
        

            An accredited business or organization agrees to: 

                    1. Promptly respond to all complaints forwarded by BBB by: 
1. Resolving the complaint directly with the complainant and notifying BBB, or

                            2. Providing BBB with a response that BBB determines: 

                                    1. is professional,
                                
2. addresses all of the issues raised by the complainant,
3. includes appropriate evidence and documents supporting the business' position, and

                                    4. explains why any relief sought by the complainant cannot or should not be granted.
                                





                    2. Make a good faith effort to resolve disputes, which includes mediation if requested by BBB. Other dispute resolution options, including arbitration, may be recommended by BBB when other efforts to resolve a dispute have failed. BBB may consider a business' willingness to participate in recommended dispute resolution options in determining compliance with these standards.
                

                    3. Comply with any settlements, agreements or decisions reached as an outcome of a BBB dispute resolution process.
                

                    4. Cooperate with BBB in efforts to eliminate the underlying cause of patterns of customer complaints that are identified by BBB.
                







Safeguard Privacy









            Protect any data collected against mishandling and fraud, collect personal information only as needed, and respect the preferences of customers regarding the use of their information.
        

            An accredited business or organization agrees to: 

                    1. Respect Privacy Businesses conducting e-commerce agree to disclose on their Web site the following: 
1. what information they collect,
2. with whom it is shared,
3. how it can be corrected,
4. how it is secured,

                            5. how policy changes will be communicated, and;
                        
6. how to address concerns over misuse of personal data.



                    2. Secure Sensitive Data Businesses that collect sensitive data online (credit card, bank account numbers, Social Security number, salary or other personal financial information, medical history or records, etc.) will ensure that it is transmitted via secure means.Businesses will make best efforts to comply with industry standards for the protection and proper disposal of all sensitive data, both online and offline.
                    
                

                    3. Honor Customer Preferences

                     Businesses agree to respect customer preferences regarding contact by telephone, fax and e-mail, and agree to remedy the underlying cause of any failure to do so.
                







Embody Integrity









            Approach all business dealings, marketplace transactions and commitments with integrity.
            
        

            An accredited business or organization agrees to:
            
1. Avoid involvement, by the business or its principles, in activities that reflect unfavorably on, or otherwise adversely affect the public image of BBB or its accredited businesses.












BBB Accreditation Reviews

BBB routinely monitors its files on all Accredited Businesses to affirm that they continue to meet all BBB Accreditation Standards











BBB Accreditation Process


        Not every business is eligible for BBB Accreditation. Businesses must meet, commit to and maintain the
        BBB Code of Business Practices (Accreditation Standards) 
        in order to be eligible for and maintain BBB Accreditation. The BBB Code of Business Practices represents sound advertising, selling and customer
        service practices that enhance customer trust and confidence in business. The Code is built on the BBB Standards for Trust, eight principles that
        summarize important elements of creating and maintaining trust in business.
    

        In order to be eligible for Accreditation a business must complete an Accreditation application.        
    

        Upon receipt of a fully completed BBB Application for Accreditation, BBB staff:        
        
Reviews the application
Researches the business
Verifies the information presented in the application 
May request additional information
May request proof of specific information on the application

        After the review and verification process, BBB will then evaluate if the business meets the
        BBB Code of Business Practices (Accreditation Standards)..
    
    
        Once BBB has finished its evaluation, the application for BBB Accreditation is either approved or denied. If the applicant is found in compliance with the BBB Code of Business Practices it will be presented to the BBB Board of Directors, or a committee of that board, for final approval. If the application is denied, BBB will contact the applicant, indicating the BBB Standard(s) that were not met and any recourse available to the applicant.        
    
















Piedmont Natural Gas Co., Inc.






            BBB Rating Scorecard
        












 




                Piedmont Natural Gas Co., Inc.
            
BBB ACCREDITATION SINCE 05/01/1953










A+




BBB Rating System Overview














Customer Review Rating:









                        The BBB Customer Review Rating represents the customer's opinion of the business.
                        The Customer Review Rating percentages are based on the total number of positive,
                        neutral, and negative reviews posted.
                    



100%




[0] Positive Reviews



[0] Neutral Reviews



[1] Negative Reviews



[1] Total Customer Reviews
                        





[35] Total Customer Complaints
                        










Composite Score:





                        Piedmont Natural Gas Co., Inc. has received 3.68 out of 5 stars based on 1 Customer Reviews and a BBB Rating of A+.
                        






                            Comprised of 67% BBB Rating and 33% Customer Review Rating.
                        

                            The BBB Customer Review Rating represents the customer's opinion of the business. The Customer Review
                            Rating percentages are based on the total number of positive, neutral, and negative reviews posted.
                        

                            The BBB letter grade represents the BBB's opinion of how the business is likely to interact with its customers.
                            The BBB grade is based on BBB file information about the business.
                            In some cases, a business' grade may be lowered if the BBB does not have sufficient
                            information about the business despite BBB's requests for that information from the business.
                        

                            The BBB Customer Review Rating plus the BBB Rating is not a guarantee of a business'
                            reliability or performance. BBB recommends that consumers consider a business'
                            BBB Rating and Customer Review Rating in addition to all other available information
                            about the business.
                        














Share your experience


              Submit a Review
          

            Submit a Complaint
        











Share




Print






































































×
Claim Your Business


                By claiming your Business Profile, businesses can add custom text or descriptive information about their services, insert company logos, and add photographs for consumers to view.
            

Close










×
AccreditedQuestionModal title


                content
            

Close










×
Customer Rating Modal title


                content
            

Close










×
Score Modal title


                content
            

Close











×
Find a Location







Filter







Close




 






























 










Southern Piedmont Carolinas Natural Gas Companies - Find BBB Accredited Natural Gas Companies in Southern Piedmont Carolinas
































































































Categories Related to Natural Gas Companies












CONNECT
WITH


			      Trustworthy Natural Gas Companies			  



Connect with
Trustworthy Natural Gas Companies
In Your Neighborhood

CONNECT
WITH

ACCREDITED BUSINESSES






Accredited Business Directory
Find Businesses You Can Trust

Southern Piedmont/Charlotte, NC HomeAccredited Business Directory / Natural ResourcesNatural Gas Companies
Natural Gas Companies







Legend

BBB Accredited Sponsor

BBB Accredited Business




Filter by


Categories Related to Natural Gas Companies






Filter by City


Asheville
Charlotte
Morganton
Waynesville






Categories Related to Natural Gas Companies




Gas - Propane
Gas - Propane - Equipment & Supplies





Natural Gas Companies in Local Cities

Natural Gas Companies in Other Cities

Mobile, AL
Omaha, NE
Atlanta, GA
Dayton, OH
Knoxville, TN
Longview, TX
Halifax, NS
Baltimore, MD


BBB Accredited Natural Gas Companies  have all agreed to a set of high standards in their business practices. Learn more about BBB Accreditation.






All BBB Accredited  Natural Gas Companies






Business Name / Address
Type of Business
BBB Accreditation 

 





Asheville Oil Company

        
                
        4 Fairview Rd 
        Asheville, NC 
4 Fairview Rd
Asheville
NC





 

 


Blossman Gas, Inc.

        
                
        170 Sweeten Creek Rd 
        Asheville, NC 
170 Sweeten Creek Rd
Asheville
NC





 

 


Blossman Gas, Inc.

        
                
        2161 Dellwood Rd 
        Waynesville, NC 
2161 Dellwood Rd
Waynesville
NC





 

 


Heritage Propane

        
                
        215 Carbon City Rd 
        Morganton, NC 
215 Carbon City Rd
Morganton
NC





 

 


Piedmont Natural Gas Co., Inc.

        
                
        4720 Piedmont Row Dr Ste 100 
        Charlotte, NC 
4720 Piedmont Row Dr Ste 100
Charlotte
NC





 





Total Result: 5















If you would like to be listed in Natural Gas Companies, you can 
							apply to become BBB Accredited.











×











XWhat is a BBB Business Review?
We offer free reviews on businesses that include background, licensing, consumer experience and other information such as governmental actions that is known to BBB. These reviews are provided for businesses that are BBB accredited and also for businesses that are not BBB accredited.

XBBB Reporting Policy
As a matter of policy, BBB does not endorse any product, service or business.
BBB Business Reviews are provided solely to assist you in exercising your own best judgment. Information in this BBB Business Review is believed reliable but not guaranteed as to accuracy.
BBB Business Reviews generally cover a three-year reporting period. BBB Business Reviews are subject to change at any time.











 







Piedmont Natural Gas Co Inc. (NYSE:PNY) : Articles :: Law360


































Search




Advanced Search

Take a Free Trial | 
					Sign In






















 Close


Law360 In-Depth
Law360 UK
Adv. Search & Platform Tools
Browse all sections 
Banking
Bankruptcy
Class Action
Competition
Employment
Energy
Expert Analysis
Insurance
Intellectual Property
Product Liability
Securities
Rankings
Law360's MVPs
Glass Ceiling Report
Global 20
Law360 400
Diversity Snapshot
Practice Group Partner Rankings
Practice Groups of the Year
Pro Bono Firms of the Year
Rising Stars
Trial Aces
Site Menu
Join the Law360 team
Search legal jobs
Learn more about Law360
Read testimonials
Contact Law360
Sign up for our newsletters
Site Map
Help













Piedmont Natural Gas Co Inc.


 News & Case Alert  on Piedmont Natural Ga...



Utilities » Gas Utilities » Piedmont Natural Gas Co Inc.







Alert me of new articles

Menu options for Piedmont Natural Gas Co Inc. 


Everything »
News & Analysis »
New Cases »
New PTAB Cases »
Case Activity »
Outside Counsel »


Sections


Asset Management (1)
Capital Markets (3)
Commercial Contracts (1)
Competition (1)
Energy (24)
Environmental (10)
Florida (2)
Intellectual Property (1)
Media & Entertainment (1)
Mergers & Acquisitions (11)
Native American (2)
Private Equity (1)
Project Finance (19)
Public Policy (1)
Technology (1)
Texas (3)
Transportation (4)







×
Search within the list below:







Name
Count






Continue
Cancel










×
Please assign a name to this alert






Save Alert
Cancel













Search News


















News (26)


July 21, 2017
FERC Gives Final Enviro Assessment Of Dominion Pipeline
... include Duke Energy, Piedmont Natural Gas and Southern Company Gas, according to Dominion’s website...


January  3, 2017
$5B Dominion Pipeline Clear-Cut Catches FERC's Attention
..., backed by Dominion Resource Inc., Duke Energy Corp., Piedmont Natural Gas Co. Inc. and AGL Resources Inc...


December  5, 2016
Utility Mergers And Acquisitions Lift Capital Markets
..., 2015, Duke Energy Corporation (Duke) and Piedmont Natural Gas Company Inc. (Piedmont) entered into an...


October 11, 2016
Duke Energy Reaps $2.4B From International Biz Sales
... business, which was bolstered by our recent Piedmont Natural Gas acquisition," she said.

That $4.9 billion...


September 29, 2016
Duke Gets Final OK For $5B Piedmont Acquisition
... gas utility Piedmont Natural Gas Co. Inc., Duke announced, saying a blessing from the North Carolina...


August 31, 2016
State Of Texas Legal Market: More M&A Work Than You Think
... were Duke Energy’s acquisition of Piedmont Natural Gas Co., Emera’s pending acquisition of...


August 15, 2016
Liberty Media Prices $444.6M Bond To Help Fund Acquisitions
... August 10, Duke Energy Corp., which is in the process of buying Piedmont Natural Gas Co Inc. for $4.9...


August 11, 2016
Duke Prices $3.75B Bond To Help Fund Piedmont Acquisition
...Duke Energy Corp., which is in the process of buying Piedmont Natural Gas Co Inc. for $4.9 billion...


February 12, 2016
New Route For $5B Atlantic Coast Pipeline Unveiled
...., Piedmont Natural Gas Co. Inc. and AGL Resources Inc., was ordered in January to redraw its path for the...


January 21, 2016
$5B Gas Pipeline Must Be Rerouted, Forest Service Says
... Resources Inc., Duke Energy Corp., Piedmont Natural Gas Co. Inc. and AGL Resources Inc. — on Tuesday...


January 20, 2016
M&A Group Of The Year: Kirkland & Ellis
...’s takeover of its No. 2 rival, and Piedmont Natural Gas in a $4.9 billion sale to Duke Energy.

The firm also...


January 20, 2016
Energy Group Of The Year: Sidley Austin
... company is set to acquire Piedmont Natural Gas Co. Inc. for $4.9 billion in cash and the assumption of...


December 22, 2015
Duke Energy Gets FTC OK For $5B Piedmont Acquisition
... Energy Corp. to complete its proposed $4.9 billion acquisition of gas utility Piedmont Natural Gas Co...


December  9, 2015
5 Energy M&A Trends Amid 2015 Oil Price Slump
... October, Duke Energy Corp. agreed to pay $4.9 billion for gas utility Piedmont Natural Gas Co. Inc., one...


October 26, 2015
Duke Gasses Up With $4.9B Piedmont Acquistion
... to pay $4.9 billion for gas utility Piedmont Natural Gas Co. Inc., one of its partners in a $5...


September 21, 2015
Dominion Asks FERC To OK $5B Atlantic Coast Pipeline
...; comprising Dominion, Duke Energy Corp., Piedmont Natural Gas Co. Inc. and AGL Resources Inc. — said in...


August 24, 2015
How To Protect IP In Energy Industry Joint Ventures
... Natural Gas Co. Inc. and AGL Resources Inc. formed a joint venture to build and operate the proposed 1.5...


May 15, 2015
FERC Won't Hold More Hearings On $5B Natural Gas Pipeline
..., along with a consortium also consisting of Duke Energy Corp., Piedmont Natural Gas Co. Inc. and gas...


May  4, 2015
Enviros, Tribe Question $5B Pipeline Before FERC
... Natural Gas Co. Inc. and gas utility AGL Resources Inc., announced the ACP in September.

The pipeline...


March 26, 2015
Dominion Plans $1B Gas-Fired Power Plant In Southern Va.
... billion Atlantic Coast Pipeline project being planned by Dominion, Duke Energy Corp., Piedmont Natural Gas...



	Show: 2050100200

← Previous 1 2 Next →














×
Already have access? Click here to login



Get instant access to the one-stop news source for business lawyers
Register Now!




Get instant access to the one-stop news source for business lawyers













Email (Professional email required)






First Name



Last Name







PLEASE NOTE: A verification email will be sent to your address before you can access your trial.


Password (at least 6 characters required)



Confirm Password







Select at least one primary interest:


 Aerospace & Defense
										

 Appellate
										

 Asset Management
										

 Automotive
										

 Banking
										

 Bankruptcy
										

 California
										

 Capital Markets
										

 Class Action
										

 Commercial Contracts
										

 Competition
										

 Consumer Protection
										

 Corporate
										

 Cybersecurity & Privacy
										

 Delaware
										

 Employment
										

 Energy
										

 Environmental
										

 Financial Services Uk
										

 Florida
										

 Food & Beverage
										

 Government Contracts
										

 Health
										

 Hospitality
										

 Illinois
										

 Immigration
										

 Insurance
										

 Insurance Uk
										

 Intellectual Property
										

 International Arbitration
										

 International Trade
										

 Law360 In Depth
										

 Legal Ethics
										

 Life Sciences
										

 Media & Entertainment
										

 Medical Malpractice
										

 Mergers & Acquisitions
										

 Native American
										

 New Jersey
										

 New York
										

 Pennsylvania
										

 Private Equity
										

 Product Liability
										

 Project Finance
										

 Public Policy
										

 Real Estate
										

 Retail & E Commerce
										

 Securities
										

 Sports
										

 Tax
										

 Technology
										

 Telecommunications
										

 Texas
										

 Transportation
										

 Trials
										

 White Collar
										





Register




Already have access?




Email:



Password:

Forgot your password?


Remember login



Sign In


















Piedmont Natural Gas Company, Inc.                                                                                       - Spartanburg                                       , SC         - Company Information









 



























Products
Resources
My Account












Talk to a D&B Advisor 
1-800-280-0780 




Business Directory



SC



Spartanburg



Natural Gas Distribution



Natural Gas Distribution



                            Piedmont Natural Gas Company, Inc.
                                    



 





















P 


Piedmont Natural Gas Company, Inc.                                                                                      
CLAIM THIS BUSINESS



501 W BLACKSTOCK RD SPARTANBURG, SC 29301
Get Directions



(864) 576-5588
www.piedmontng.com                                                                                      





Business Info



 Founded --
 Incorporated 
 Annual Revenue --
 Employee Count 91
 Industries Natural Gas Distribution
 Contacts Mike Perry                                                                                                              







Contact Business







Your Email Address

Subject:


Message


Send Message





Company Summary


Additional information is available at www.piedmontng.com                                                                                       or by contacting Mike Perry                                                                                                               at (864) 576-5588. 









VERIFIED Status:
UNVERIFIED



Address:
UNVERIFIED





LAST VERIFIED:

                                    --
                                



Phone:

                                    UNVERIFIED
                                





Payment Method:
UNVERIFIED


view full report





Similar Businesses Nearby


                                        Our similar businesses nearby shows similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Competitive Landscape


                                        Our competitive landscape shows how this business compares to similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Payments Accepted

NO DATA



Hours



                                        Sunday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Monday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Tuesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Wednesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Thursday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Friday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Saturday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        







P

VIEW ADDITIONAL DATA                        
Select from over 115 networks below to view available data about this business. If this data is unavailable or inaccurate and you own or represent this business, click here for more information on how you may be able to correct it. 







Credibility Review





Google





Facebook.com





Yellowbook.com





Bing.com





Yellowpages.com





MerchantCircle





Tele Atlas (TomTom)





Twitter.com





AOL





MapQuest





Yahoo Local





Apple/Siri





Groupon





Hotfrog.com





Comcast.net Search





ReachLocal





Admedia





Dealsplus





Shoptopia.com





Alteryx





Dogtime Media





KSL.com





Sirtune





AmericanTowns.com





Driverside





Kudzu.com





SpecialsAgent.com





Answers.com





eGood





LawInfo.com





spotlikes.com





anywho.com





eGumball





Likeness.com





Spotzot





eServiceLog





MapMyRun





TechnoCom





apartmentguide.com





ezlocal.com





EZToUse.com





Teleroute





AroundMe.com





metropolist.com





Therapists.com





Atlanta NewHomes





FindLaw.com





Time Out New York





Avantar





FindTheBest.com





mojopages.com





B2B Yellowpages





Fivestar Software





MyCityWay.com





TripAdvisor





bckyrd.com





GiftCards.com





MyCoupons.com





beachcalifornia.com





GoLocal247.com





mymove.com





UpMeSocial.com





Belo





GoodInfo





News-Gazette





Nokia





usdirectory.com





Cars.com





Nomao





Centzy.com





hibu





Openlist.com





ChaCha Search





Homeplate.com





OwnLocal.com





VisiKard





challama.com





Homestore





patch.com





Voltari





CityBot





Pelopidas





Vouchd





ClassifiedAds





Hostway





PlaceIQ





WalkScore.com





CloudMade





Hoodoyou





PlanetDiscover.com





WeddingWire.com





PowerProfiles





Where Inc.





Contractors.com





iGoLocal.com





Radiate Media





Wikiocity





CouponMap





Indeed.com





Wimgo.com





CrowdSpot





Innova Electronics





Intellistrand





realtor.com





DataSphere





InTheMO.com





Reply.com





Yellowbot.com





JiWire





Rocket Fuel





YellowPageCity.com





DMV.org





Justclicklocal.com





Dirxion





Keen.com





Zidster.com












Photos














































Business Credit Report
Receive a one-time comprehensive credit report on this company.
get full credit report


Facebook








Twitter








Yelp






































Call 1.800.280.0780 to speak with a D&B Advisor Today!







Customer Resources
Products
Education Center
Business Articles & Insights
Glossary
Contact Us
Customer Support
Communication Preferences
Search for D&B D-U-N-S




Our Company
About Us
Company History
Business Credit History
Careers
Press Releases
News
Success Stories
Hoovers




Our Network
Partners
Affiliates
Blog
Access to Capital
Entrepreneurial Initiative
D&B International
SupplierEdge




Site Links
Business Directory
Site Map
PIPEDA
Privacy Policy
Website Terms of Service
Product License Agreement







© Dun & Bradstreet, Inc. 2017. All rights reserved.














Piedmont Natural Gas Co Inc in Charlotte, North Carolina with Reviews - YP.comStart your search by typing in the business name below.
What do you want to find?

Where?My current locationSearchHomeCharlotte, NCPiedmont Natural Gas Co IncCharlotte, NC Piedmont Natural Gas Co IncAbout Search ResultsAbout Search ResultsYP - The Real Yellow PagesSM - helps you find the right local businesses to meet your specific needs. Search results are sorted by a combination of factors to give you a set of choices in response to your search criteria. These factors are similar to those you might use to determine which business to select from a local Yellow Pages directory, including proximity to where you are searching, expertise in the specific services or products you need, and comprehensive business information to help evaluate a business's suitability for you. “Preferred” listings, or those with featured website buttons, indicate YP advertisers who directly provide information about their businesses to help consumers make more informed buying decisions. YP advertisers receive higher placement in the default ordering of search results and may appear in sponsored listings on the top, side, or bottom of the search results page.Sort:DefaultDefaultDistanceRatingName (A - Z)Sponsored LinksAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your home collection!Error when adding to home collectionThis business was removed from the home collection1. Piedmont Natural Gas Co(1)4339 S Tryon StCharlotte, NC 28217(704) 525-5585Gas CompaniesWebsiteI tried  the  first 3  phone numbers  listed and  no one answered  any of themComplete  waste of  time!!!Add to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your home collection!Error when adding to home collectionThis business was removed from the home collection2. Piedmont Natural Gas(1)Charlotte, NC 28273(800) 752-7504Gas CompaniesUtility CompaniesWebsitegood company to have they always work with you on ur bill not like other companiesAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your home collection!Error when adding to home collectionThis business was removed from the home collection3. Piedmont Natural Gas Co IncBBB Rating: A+4720 Piedmont Row DrCharlotte, NC 28210(704) 364-3120Propane & Natural GasGas CompaniesWebsiteFrom Business: Founded in 1950, Piedmont Natural Gas Company is an energy services company that is engaged primarily in the distribution of natural gas to nearly 1 million resid…Add to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your home collection!Error when adding to home collectionThis business was removed from the home collection4. Piedmont Natural Gas Co4301 Yancey RdCharlotte, NC 28217(704) 587-3120Propane & Natural GasGas CompaniesWebsiteAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your home collection!Error when adding to home collectionThis business was removed from the home collection5. Piedmont Natural Gas Co112b Verbena StCharlotte, NC 28217(800) 752-7504Propane & Natural GasGas CompaniesWebsiteAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your home collection!Error when adding to home collectionThis business was removed from the home collection6. Piedmont Natural Gas - CLOSED6500 Rozzelles Ferry RdCharlotte, NC 28214(704) 398-9300Propane & Natural GasGas CompaniesAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your home collection!Error when adding to home collectionThis business was removed from the home collection7. Piedmont Natural Gas Company IncCharlotte, NC 28233(800) 752-7504Propane & Natural GasWebsiteAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your home collection!Error when adding to home collectionThis business was removed from the home collection8. Png Propane Co-A Division Of Piedmont Natural Gas Co - CLOSED4125 Yancey RdCharlotte, NC 28217(704) 527-6972Gas CompaniesAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your home collection!Error when adding to home collectionThis business was removed from the home collection9. Piedmont Natural Gas-- Corporate Office--Charlotte, NC 28233(800) 752-7504Propane & Natural GasGas CompaniesWebsiteAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your home collection!Error when adding to home collectionThis business was removed from the home collection10. Png Propane Company A Division Of Piedmont Natural - CLOSED3817 S Tryon StCharlotte, NC 28217(800) 532-6141Propane & Natural GasAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your home collection!Error when adding to home collectionThis business was removed from the home collection11. Piedmont Natural Gas Co5601 Cannon DrMonroe, NC 28110(800) 752-7504Propane & Natural GasGas CompaniesWebsiteAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your home collection!Error when adding to home collectionThis business was removed from the home collection12. Carolina Natural Gas - CLOSED8635 Crown Crescent CtCharlotte, NC 28227(704) 814-7283Propane & Natural GasGas CompaniesAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your home collection!Error when adding to home collectionThis business was removed from the home collection13. Piedmont Energy Partners Inc4720 Piedmont Row DrCharlotte, NC 28210(704) 364-3120Gas CompaniesWebsiteAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your home collection!Error when adding to home collectionThis business was removed from the home collection14. Piedmont Intrastate Pipeline1915 Rexford RdCharlotte, NC 28211(704) 364-3120Gas CompaniesPipe Line CompaniesWebsiteAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your home collection!Error when adding to home collectionThis business was removed from the home collection15. York County Natural Gas112 Academy StFort Mill, SC 29715(803) 547-5187Propane & Natural GasGas CompaniesAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your home collection!Error when adding to home collectionThis business was removed from the home collection16. Lancaster County Natural Gas Authority9041 Northfield DrFort Mill, SC 29707(803) 548-4777Propane & Natural GasGas CompaniesWebsiteAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your home collection!Error when adding to home collectionThis business was removed from the home collection17. York County Natural Gas Authority(1)979 W Main StRock Hill, SC 29730(803) 323-5304Propane & Natural GasGas CompaniesWebsiteFrom Business: York County Natural Gas Authority provides residential, commercial and industrial gas service throughout York County in South Carolina. The authority was created …Add to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your home collection!Error when adding to home collectionThis business was removed from the home collection18. York Natural Gas7718 Park Place RdYork, SC 29745(803) 684-6867Propane & Natural GasAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your home collection!Error when adding to home collectionThis business was removed from the home collection19. York County Natural Gas1086 W Alexander Love HwyYork, SC 29745(803) 628-5823Propane & Natural GasGas CompaniesAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your home collection!Error when adding to home collectionThis business was removed from the home collection20. York County Natural Gas4675 Bookout RdMc Connells, SC 29726(803) 684-0212Propane & Natural GasGas CompaniesAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your other collection!Error when adding to other collectionThis business was removed from the other collection21. Roberts Oxygen Company Inc3320 Service StCharlotte, NC 28206(704) 371-3030Welding Equipment & SupplyWebsiteAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your other collection!Error when adding to other collectionThis business was removed from the other collection22. Gas Fired Products Inc2250 Toomey AveCharlotte, NC 28203(980) 819-7850Propane & Natural Gas-Equipment &...WebsiteAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your home collection!Error when adding to home collectionThis business was removed from the home collection23. Heritage Propane Inc100 Forsyth Hall DrCharlotte, NC 28273(704) 527-5687Propane & Natural GasWebsiteAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your home collection!Error when adding to home collectionThis business was removed from the home collection24. Piedmont Filter Service Co4667 Edgeland RdEdgemoor, SC 29712(803) 327-6947Filters-Air & GasAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your home collection!Error when adding to home collectionThis business was removed from the home collection25. Hilton Pond Ctr For Piedmont1432 Devinney RdYork, SC 29745(803) 684-5852Gas CompaniesWebsiteAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your home collection!Error when adding to home collectionThis business was removed from the home collection26. Public Service Co-NC Inc800 Gaston RdGastonia, NC 28056(877) 776-2427Gas CompaniesGas StationsWebsiteFrom Business: PSNC Energy is a subsidiary of SCANA Corporation, a Fortune 500 energy services provider. It is a regulated public utility involved in purchasing, transporting, d…Add to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your other collection!Error when adding to other collectionThis business was removed from the other collection27. Universal Medical Gas Inc3850 Matthews Indian Trail RdMatthews, NC 28104(704) 821-4933Propane & Natural Gas-Equipment &...WebsiteAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your home collection!Error when adding to home collectionThis business was removed from the home collection28. Britton Oil & Propane CoBBB Rating: A+104 Mariposa RdStanley, NC 28164(704) 263-1211Propane & Natural GasFuel OilsWebsiteDirectionsFrom Business: Serving Gaston & Lincolnton CountiesAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your car collection!Error when adding to car collectionThis business was removed from the car collection29. All Star Gas Inc Of Gastonia517 Tulip DrGastonia, NC 28052(800) 822-6540Gas StationsPropane & Natural GasWebsiteAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your home collection!Error when adding to home collectionThis business was removed from the home collection30. Reid Gas IncBBB Rating: A+1505 Mount Holly RdRock Hill, SC 29730(803) 328-3811Propane & Natural GasSponsored LinksShowing1-30
of 35results12NextMap ViewSponsoredSuburban Propane1333 Berryhill Rd, Charlotte, NC 28208(980) 209-2134Our Business Is Customer SatisfactionWebsiteDirectionsMore InfoPerry's Market(2)6727 Wilgrove Mint Hill Rd, Mint Hill, NC 28227(704) 545-6978Contact Us For InformationDirectionsMore InfoSuburban PropaneFind a Location(800) 570-8024Our Business Is In Customer Satisfaction.WebsiteSchedule a ConsultationMore InfoDidn't find what you were looking for?magnifying glassHelpful Reviews Bring It Home Propane Exchangejasonamodeo ratedI love this service.  It's super convenient and they actually fill your tank FULL!  Blue Rhino only gives your 3/4 of a tank and you have to drive all the way to the store to swap it out.  These guys bring it right to your house which is great.  Bring It Home Propane ExchangeScott T. ratedSo much better than going to the gas station. When you find yourself out of propane, they will bring you a full tank that next day. It's awesome. I can't see myself going to the gas station again to get my propane. Piedmont Natural GasKiara M. ratedgoodgood company to have they always work with you on ur bill not like other companies 
We just redesigned yp.com! Do you like it?×            LikeNot a Fan×            Thank You!Feedback





BBB Business Profile | Piedmont Natural Gas Company, Inc | Accreditation



















Home
 > 
Accredited Business Directory
 > 
Natural Gas Companies
 > 
Piedmont Natural Gas Company, Inc














BBB Accredited Business Profile






Piedmont Natural Gas Company, Inc



Request a Quote

































Piedmont Natural Gas Company, Inc






            Business Information
        






(800) 752-7504

Piedmont Natural Gas Company, Inc
67 years in business

        100 Woodruff Industrial Lane
        Greenville, SC 29607
    




 EMAIL
            

                 WEBSITE
            





                    Fax Numbers
                


                            (864) 234-8104
                        




                    Additional Email Addresses
                


                            customerselfservice@piedmontng.com
                        





See Less Contact Options
See More Contact Options





Find a Location






                BBB File Opened: 10/07/1982
            

                Business Started: 05/01/1950


                Business Incorporated: 06/08/1950 in SC





            Type of Entity
             
            Corporation       
    



            Business Management
        


                    Mr. Minh Tran, SC Regional Executive
                

                    Mr. Michael Durham, Community Relations Manager
                






            Business Category
        


                Natural Gas Companies
            








 







BBB Accreditation





                BBB Accredited Since 10/07/1982
            

                BBB has determined that Piedmont Natural Gas Company, Inc meets Standards of BBB Accreditation, which include a commitment to make a good faith effort to resolve any consumer complaints. BBB Accredited Businesses pay a fee for accreditation review/monitoring and for support of BBB services to the public.
            

                BBB accreditation does not mean that the business's products or services have been evaluated or endorsed by BBB, or that BBB has made a determination as to the business's product quality or competency in performing services.
            








Standards of BBB Accreditation






Build Trust









            Establish and maintain a positive track record in the marketplace.
        

           An accredited business or organization agrees to:

                   1. Have been operational (actively selling products or services) in any BBB service area for at least the most recent 6 months, unless the principle(s) previously operated a similar business with an eligible record (one that qualifies for BBB accreditation).
                

                   1. Fulfill contracts signed and agreements reached.
                

                   3. Be free from government action that demonstrates a significant failure to support BBB ethical principles in marketplace transactions (this requires a determination by BBB as to the nature of any violation, whether it was caused or condoned by management, and actions taken to resolve underlying issues that led to the government action).
                
4. Be free of an unsatisfactory rating and maintain at least a B rating at the accrediting BBB and the BBB where it is headquartered, if different.

                   5. In its relationship with BBB: 
1. meet all applicable standards within this Code of Business Practices

                            2. cooperate with BBB's activities and efforts to promote voluntary self- regulation within the business' industry
                        
3. honor any settlements, agreements or decisions reached as an outcome of a BBB dispute resolution process

                            4. complete the required application and pay all monetary obligations to BBB in a timely manner
                        









Advertise Honestly









            Adhere to established standards of advertising and selling.
        

            An accredited business or organization agrees to: 

                    1. Follow federal, state/provincial and local advertising laws.
                

                    2. Abide by the BBB Code of Advertising. Supply, upon request, substantiation for advertising and selling claims. Correct advertising and selling practices, when recommended by BBB.
                
3. Adhere to applicable BBB industry codes of advertising.
4. Cooperate with BBB self-regulatory programs for the resolution of advertising disputes.
5. Use the BBB name and logos in accordance with BBB policy.

                    6. Avoid misleading customers by creating the false impression of sponsorship, endorsement, popularity, trustworthiness, product quality or business size through the misuse of logos, trustmarks, pictures, testimonials, or other means
                







Tell the Truth









            Honestly represent products and services, including clear and adequate disclosures of all material terms.
        

            An accredited business or organization agrees to: 

                    1. Make known all material facts in both written and verbal representations, remembering that misrepresentation may result not only from direct statements but by omitting or obscuring relevant facts.
                

                    2. Ensure that any written materials are readily available, clear, accurate and complete.
                







Be Transparent









            Openly identify the nature, location, and ownership of the business, and clearly disclose all policies, guarantees and procedures that bear on a customer's decision to buy.
        

            An accredited business or organization agrees to: 

                    1. Upon request, provide BBB with all information required to evaluate compliance with BBB standards. This may include, but is not limited to business name, address and contact information; names and background of principles; business and banking references; licensing and/or professional accreditation; and a complete description of the nature of the business.
                

                    2. Clearly disclose to customers:

                    
1. direct and effective means to contact the business
2. terms of any written contract
3. any guarantees or warranties accompanying a product

                            4. any restrictions or limitations imposed (e.g. limited supply,maximum number available per customer)
                        
5. the business' return/refund policy

                            6. any recurring commitment into which the customer may be entering, including information on how future billing will occur
                        
7. total cost of the transaction, including tax, shipping and handling, and other related charges



                    3. If selling products or providing services on Web sites or via other electronic means: 
1. provide any required product labeling information

                            2. disclose the nature and terms of shipping, including any known delays or shortages of stock
                        
3. provide an opportunity to review and confirm the transaction before the sale is completed

                            4. provide a receipt summarizing the transaction after the purchase
                        









Honor Promises









            Abide by all written agreements and verbal representations.
        

            An accredited business or organization agrees to: 
1. Fulfill contracts signed and agreements reached. 2. Honor representations by correcting mistakes as quickly as possible.







Be Responsive









            Address marketplace disputes quickly, professionally, and in good faith.
        

            An accredited business or organization agrees to: 

                    1. Promptly respond to all complaints forwarded by BBB by: 
1. Resolving the complaint directly with the complainant and notifying BBB, or

                            2. Providing BBB with a response that BBB determines: 

                                    1. is professional,
                                
2. addresses all of the issues raised by the complainant,
3. includes appropriate evidence and documents supporting the business' position, and

                                    4. explains why any relief sought by the complainant cannot or should not be granted.
                                





                    2. Make a good faith effort to resolve disputes, which includes mediation if requested by BBB. Other dispute resolution options, including arbitration, may be recommended by BBB when other efforts to resolve a dispute have failed. BBB may consider a business' willingness to participate in recommended dispute resolution options in determining compliance with these standards.
                

                    3. Comply with any settlements, agreements or decisions reached as an outcome of a BBB dispute resolution process.
                

                    4. Cooperate with BBB in efforts to eliminate the underlying cause of patterns of customer complaints that are identified by BBB.
                







Safeguard Privacy









            Protect any data collected against mishandling and fraud, collect personal information only as needed, and respect the preferences of customers regarding the use of their information.
        

            An accredited business or organization agrees to: 

                    1. Respect Privacy Businesses conducting e-commerce agree to disclose on their Web site the following: 
1. what information they collect,
2. with whom it is shared,
3. how it can be corrected,
4. how it is secured,

                            5. how policy changes will be communicated, and;
                        
6. how to address concerns over misuse of personal data.



                    2. Secure Sensitive Data Businesses that collect sensitive data online (credit card, bank account numbers, Social Security number, salary or other personal financial information, medical history or records, etc.) will ensure that it is transmitted via secure means.Businesses will make best efforts to comply with industry standards for the protection and proper disposal of all sensitive data, both online and offline.
                    
                

                    3. Honor Customer Preferences

                     Businesses agree to respect customer preferences regarding contact by telephone, fax and e-mail, and agree to remedy the underlying cause of any failure to do so.
                







Embody Integrity









            Approach all business dealings, marketplace transactions and commitments with integrity.
            
        

            An accredited business or organization agrees to:
            
1. Avoid involvement, by the business or its principles, in activities that reflect unfavorably on, or otherwise adversely affect the public image of BBB or its accredited businesses.












BBB Accreditation Reviews

BBB routinely monitors its files on all Accredited Businesses to affirm that they continue to meet all BBB Accreditation Standards











BBB Accreditation Process


        Not every business is eligible for BBB Accreditation. Businesses must meet, commit to and maintain the
        BBB Code of Business Practices (Accreditation Standards) 
        in order to be eligible for and maintain BBB Accreditation. The BBB Code of Business Practices represents sound advertising, selling and customer
        service practices that enhance customer trust and confidence in business. The Code is built on the BBB Standards for Trust, eight principles that
        summarize important elements of creating and maintaining trust in business.
    

        In order to be eligible for Accreditation a business must complete an Accreditation application.        
    

        Upon receipt of a fully completed BBB Application for Accreditation, BBB staff:        
        
Reviews the application
Researches the business
Verifies the information presented in the application 
May request additional information
May request proof of specific information on the application

        After the review and verification process, BBB will then evaluate if the business meets the
        BBB Code of Business Practices (Accreditation Standards)..
    
    
        Once BBB has finished its evaluation, the application for BBB Accreditation is either approved or denied. If the applicant is found in compliance with the BBB Code of Business Practices it will be presented to the BBB Board of Directors, or a committee of that board, for final approval. If the application is denied, BBB will contact the applicant, indicating the BBB Standard(s) that were not met and any recourse available to the applicant.        
    
















Piedmont Natural Gas Company, Inc






            BBB Rating Scorecard
        












 




                Piedmont Natural Gas Company, Inc
            
BBB ACCREDITATION SINCE 10/07/1982










A+




BBB Rating System Overview














Customer Review Rating:









                        The BBB Customer Review Rating represents the customer's opinion of the business.
                        The Customer Review Rating percentages are based on the total number of positive,
                        neutral, and negative reviews posted.
                    


                        There are NO reviews for this business.Be the first to leave a review!
                    




[1] Total Customer Complaints
                        













        Request a Quote
    






Share your experience


              Submit a Review
          

            Submit a Complaint
        











Share




Print






































































×
Claim Your Business


                By claiming your Business Profile, businesses can add custom text or descriptive information about their services, insert company logos, and add photographs for consumers to view.
            

Close










×
AccreditedQuestionModal title


                content
            

Close










×
Customer Rating Modal title


                content
            

Close










×
Score Modal title


                content
            

Close











×
Find a Location







Filter







Close




 




















 



















        
    Natural Gas Companies - Upstate South Carolina Accredited Businesses

    







































Upstate South Carolina Home /
                BBB Accredited Business Directory / 
                Natural Gas Companies



                BBB Accredited Business Directory
            
Businesses you can trust in Upstate South Carolina

Natural Gas Companies








Category 

Category
Business Name







            near
        




  





upstatesc
accredited-business-directory
Auto Search
Auto Location













Back to Map




Filter results





Are you looking for?


Gas - Propane


Show More...




by City / Location:


Spartanburg, SC


Greenville, SC


Fountain Inn, SC


Anderson, SC




by Content:


View Listings with Coupons & Special Offers







Results for:
Natural Gas Companies
    
           in Upstate South Carolina







BBB








 





					Fountain Inn Natural Gas 


100 S Weston St Fountain Inn, SC 29644
(map)


864-862-0042   


				BBB Accredited since
								2011
				
			





BBB Business Profile



        Request a Quote









BBB








 





					Piedmont Natural Gas


1924 White Street Extension Anderson, SC 29624
(map)


800-752-7504   


				BBB Accredited since
								1988
				
			





BBB Business Profile



        Request a Quote









BBB








 





					Piedmont Natural Gas


501 West Blackstock Road Spartanburg, SC 29301
(map)


800-752-7504   


				BBB Accredited since
								1986
				
			





BBB Business Profile



        Request a Quote









BBB








 





					Piedmont Natural Gas Company, Inc


100 Woodruff Industrial Lane Greenville, SC 29607
(map)


800-752-7504   


				BBB Accredited since
								1982
				
			





BBB Business Profile



        Request a Quote











Coupon
ShowVendorContent









View Larger Map




















Filter by Business Name





X





















×













×













×













×











×
Request a Quote







email
















Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft









 



















U.S. Lower 48 | Exploration and Production | What we do | BP U.S.













            Cookie notification

            We have placed cookies on your computer to help make this website better. You can change your cookie settings at any time. Otherwise, we'll assume you're OK to continue.










United States















                    BP Global







BP:
        GBp 
( )
        USD 
( )
        
        *
    


Share price feed currently unavailable



Enable javascript for shareprice












S
Search













BP U.S.


What we do


Exploration and Production


U.S. Lower 48



U.S. Lower 48







With a footprint that stretches from the Rocky Mountains to east Texas, BP’s Lower 48 onshore business is one of America’s largest natural gas producers. And it’s only getting bigger, recently having expanded operations in New Mexico.
 
The business produces natural gas — along with oil, condensate and gas liquids — from both conventional and unconventional rock formations. 

In 2015, it produced an average of 284,000 barrels of oil equivalent each day.
 
Headquartered in Houston, its operations span five states — Colorado, New Mexico, Oklahoma, Texas and Wyoming — and seven oil and gas basins, covering an area (5.7 million net acres) roughly the size of New Jersey.
 
While wholly owned by BP, the Lower 48 business began operating as a separate entity in 2015 in order to become more competitive in a rapidly changing exploration and production environment.The move has worked.
 
“Our new business model has allowed us to combine the resources and expertise of a major international oil and gas company, with the agility of an independent producer,” says Lower 48 CEO Dave Lawler. “We can allocate capital more efficiently, generate new project opportunities, and deliver innovative well designs and development programs much faster than in the past. This mix of capability and structure unlocks significant value from our large asset base, without compromising our commitment to safety and the environment.”
 
In 2015, the business bought all of Devon Energy’s assets in the San Juan Basin of New Mexico, a region in which BP has operated for more than 30 years. The expansion added nearly 15,000 net acres to its portfolio.
 
With decades of experience in the San Juan Basin, BP has a deep understanding of its reservoirs, and the Lower 48 business has combined that knowledge with innovative technology to help boost production efficiency.
 
In 2015, for example, the company made history by completing its first-ever “multilateral” wells in the basin.
 
Multilateral wells feature multiple horizontal wells connected to a single drilling hole, or “wellbore,” allowing producers to access more of the oil and gas in a given reservoir while reducing the number of drilling sites.
 
The Lower 48 business expects that a majority of its new wells in the San Juan Basin will be multilaterals, and it is pursuing similar welldesign improvements across all its operations.



States













Colorado













Oklahoma













Wyoming















New Mexico













Texas















 



















Commitment to safety | Who we are | BP U.S.














            Cookie notification

            We have placed cookies on your computer to help make this website better. You can change your cookie settings at any time. Otherwise, we'll assume you're OK to continue.










United States















                    BP Global







BP:
        GBp 
( )
        USD 
( )
        
        *
    


Share price feed currently unavailable



Enable javascript for shareprice












S
Search













BP U.S.


Who we are


Commitment to safety



Safety


Safety isn't something you do now and then, or when it's convenient. Safety is never being satisfied. And always working to be better.








Sorry, you need Javascript enabled to view this video.
Loading video
please wait...



Safety is a mindset.
A 24/7 philosophy summed up in 30 seconds.














Stopping Problems Before They Start
From technology to training to culture, we’re always looking for ways to stop potential problems in their tracks. 












Adapting Innovative Technologies 
We look at what’s revolutionizing other industries to see how it can make our operations even safer, too.














Sophisticated Support, Around the Clock
At BP, safety is a 24/7 job for everyone. See the innovative ways we have each other’s back. 












Perfecting Skills Before We Use Them
At BP, everyone depends on each another –  we train together as a team to be better prepared for any scenario.












Get to know safety at BP












Meet Ronica Hall
BP’s Whiting Refinery processes 19 million gallons of fuel a day. Ronica Hall is always looking for safer ways to get that job done.














Start to finish
From discovery to delivery, learn how BP puts its energy into safety every step of the way.














Meet Lori Knutson
See how Lori’s team stays safe both on and offshore.











A deeper dive




previous slide








How technology makes oil and gas safer
The energy we get from oil and gas is a critical part of everyday life, and safe operations rely on innovation in technology.

Explore more









Tracking change
Take a tour of BP's data systems which link production sites to a second pair of eyes.

Explore more





next slide





slide 1


slide 2










Resources








Learn more about BP's commitment to safety
 (pdf 418.7 KB)













 



















Sophisticated support, around the clock | Commitment to safety | Who we are | BP U.S.














            Cookie notification

            We have placed cookies on your computer to help make this website better. You can change your cookie settings at any time. Otherwise, we'll assume you're OK to continue.










United States















                    BP Global







BP:
        GBp 
( )
        USD 
( )
        
        *
    


Share price feed currently unavailable



Enable javascript for shareprice












S
Search













BP U.S.


Who we are


Commitment to safety


Sophisticated support, around the clock



Sophisticated support, around the clock











Monitoring Center













Immersive Team Training















Wireless Corrosion Sensors













Remote Weather Monitoring















Stop the Job







At BP, we’re always looking for new ways to have each other’s backs. From innovative approaches to training to 24/7 monitoring and more, the men and women of BP are supported by a broad network of people and technology.





Sorry, you need Javascript enabled to view this video.
Loading video
please wait...



Meet Bob Fryar and learn about the company's Houston Monitoring Center, where onshore experts provide offshore teams 24/7 support.















See what advanced weather warnings for wind operations looks like.















We train together as a team to be better prepared for different scenarios.












More about BP's Commitment to Safety












Stopping Problems Before They Start 
At BP, safety is never being satisfied. And always working to be better.














Adapting Innovative Technologies
We figure out how to take ideas revolutionizing other industries to make our own safer. Take a look.














Perfecting Skills Before We Use Them
Learn more about how we prepare for every  situation.














 



















Perfecting skills before we use them | Commitment to safety | Who we are | BP U.S.














            Cookie notification

            We have placed cookies on your computer to help make this website better. You can change your cookie settings at any time. Otherwise, we'll assume you're OK to continue.










United States















                    BP Global







BP:
        GBp 
( )
        USD 
( )
        
        *
    


Share price feed currently unavailable



Enable javascript for shareprice












S
Search













BP U.S.


Who we are


Commitment to safety


Perfecting skills before we use them



Perfecting skills before we use them











Drill Simulation Training















Immersive Team Training







At BP, everyone depends on each another – so we train together as a team to be better prepared for any scenario. 






Sorry, you need Javascript enabled to view this video.
Loading video
please wait...



See how team training works at BP.










More about BP's Commitment to Safety












Sophisticated Support, Around the Clock
See how we’re always finding new ways to have each others’ backs.














Stopping Problems Before They Start 
At BP, safety is never being satisfied. And always working to be better.














Adapting Innovative Technologies
We figure out how to take ideas revolutionizing other industries to make our own even safer. Take a look.



























Bing Places for Business
























































































































Bing
 places for business


Sign in using your




Microsoft Account





Work Account





Google Account





Facebook Account

Don't have an account? Create one.


